Ohio, session 136, HB360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 5534.966 of the Revised Code be 5
enacted to read as follows: 6
Sec. 5534.966. The interchange of interstate route number 7
four hundred eighty and west one hundred fiftieth street, 8
located in the municipal corporation of Cleveland in Cuyahoga 9
county, shall be known as the "SPC Louis P. Shuster Memorial 10
Interchange." 11
The director of transportation may erect suitable markers 12
at the interchange indicating its name. 13